Wisconsin, session 2025, AB536.
do enact as follows:AB536,11Section 1. 7.15 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB536,2,1127.15 (1) (e) Train election officials in their duties, calling them together 3whenever advisable, advise them of changes in laws, rules and procedures affecting 4the performance of their duties, and administer examinations as authorized under 5s. 7.30 (2) (c). The training shall conform with the requirements prescribed in rules 6promulgated established by the commission under ss. 7.31 and 7.315. The clerk 7shall assure that officials who serve at polling places where an electronic voting 8system is used are familiar with the system and competent to instruct electors in its 9proper use. The clerk shall inspect systematically and thoroughly the conduct of 10elections in the municipality so that elections are honestly, efficiently and uniformly 11conducted.AB536,212Section 2. 7.30 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB536,2,18137.30 (2) (c) The governing body of any municipality may require all persons 14serving as election officials to prove their ability to read and write English and to 15have a general knowledge of the election laws. Examinations may be given to prove 16the qualifications can be met. The municipal clerk shall ensure that all training 17meets the training requirements prescribed in rules promulgated established by 18the commission under ss. 7.31 and 7.315.AB536,319Section 3. 7.31 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB536,3,317.31 (6) In addition to the training requirements established under this 2section, the commission shall require chief inspectors to attend one hour of training 3regarding voter accessibility to ensure compliance with ss. 5.25 (4) and 6.82.AB536,44Section 4. 7.315 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB536,3,957.315 (5) In addition to the training requirements established under this 6section, the commission shall require municipal clerks, inspectors, other than chief 7inspectors, special voting deputies, and election registration officials to attend one 8hour of training regarding voter accessibility to ensure compliance with ss. 5.25 (4) 9and 6.82.AB536,510Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.AB536,3,1211(1) The Elections Commission shall first provide the training required under 12ss. 7.31 (6) and 7.315 (5) before the 2027 spring election.AB536,3,1313